Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 3. Regional Planning Commissions

§ 4341.
Creation of regional planning commissions.

A regional planning commission may be created at any time by the act of the voters or the legislative body of each of a number of contiguous municipalities, upon the written approval of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development. Approval of a designated region shall be based on whether the municipalities involved constitute a logical geographic and a coherent socioeconomic planning area. All municipalities within a designated region shall be considered members of the regional planning commission. For the purpose of a regional planning commission’s carrying out its duties and functions under State law, such a designated region shall be considered a political subdivision of the State.

Two or more existing regional planning commissions may be merged to form a single commission by act of the legislative bodies in a majority of the municipalities in each of the merging regions.

A municipality may move from one regional planning commission to another regional planning commission on terms and conditions approved by the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 11, 1972;

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. July 1, 1989;

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § F.11, eff. June 3, 2010;

2013, No. 36

, § 3.

§ 4341a.
Performance grants for regional planning service.

The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development shall negotiate and issue performance grants to regional planning commissions, or to regional planning commissions and regional development corporations in the case of a joint grant, to provide regional planning services.

A performance grant shall address how the regional planning commission, or regional planning commission and regional development corporation jointly, will improve results and achieve savings compared with the current regional service delivery system, which may include:

a proposal without change in the makeup or change of the area served;

a joint proposal to provide different services pursuant to a grant to one or more regional service providers;

colocation with other local, regional, or State service providers;

merger with one or more regional service providers;

consolidation of administrative functions and additional operational efficiencies within the region; or

such other cost-saving mechanisms as may be available.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010; amended

2015, No. 11

, § 30;

2015, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § C.2, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 4342.
Regional planning commissions; membership.

A regional planning commission shall contain at least one representative appointed from each member municipality.
All representatives may be compensated and reimbursed by their respective municipalities for necessary and reasonable expenses.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 11, 1972;

1977, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 4343.
Appointment, term, and vacancy; rules.

Representatives to a regional planning commission representing each participating municipality shall be appointed for a term and any vacancy filled by the legislative body of such municipality in the manner provided and for the terms established by the charter and bylaws of the regional planning commission. Regardless of regional planning commission bylaws, representatives to the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the legislative body. The legislative body may, by majority vote of the entire body, revoke a commission member’s appointment at any time.

A regional planning commission may elect an executive board, consisting of not less than five nor more than nine members, to oversee the operations of the commission and implement the policies of the commission, and shall elect a chair and a secretary, and, at its organization meeting shall adopt, by a two-thirds vote of those representatives present and voting at such meeting, such rules and create and fill such other offices as it deems necessary or appropriate for the performance of its functions, including the number and qualification of members, terms of office, and provisions for municipal representation and voting.

A regional planning commission may also have such other members, who may be elected or appointed in such manner as the regional planning commission may prescribe by its rules adopted pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 1982;

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 3b;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010.

§ 4344.
Repealed. 2009, No. 146 (Adj. Sess.), § G5.

§ 4345.
Optional powers and duties of regional planning commissions.

Any regional planning commission created under this chapter may:

Develop an inventory of the region’s fire and safety facilities; hospitals, rest homes, or other facilities for aging or disabled persons; correctional facilities; and emergency shelters; and work with regulated utilities, the Department of Public Service, the Department of Public Safety, potential developers of distributed power facilities, adjoining regional planning commissions, interested adjoining regional entities from adjoining states, and citizens of the region to propose and evaluate alternative sites for distributed power facilities that might provide uninterrupted local or regional power at least for identified critical service providers in time of extended national, statewide, or regional power disruption or other emergency.

-(5) [Repealed.]

(6)

Undertake studies and make recommendations on land development, urban renewal, transportation, economic, industrial, commercial, and social development, urban beautification and design improvements, historic and scenic preservation, State capital investment plans, and wetland protection.

(7)

[Repealed.]

(8)

Require of each municipality in its area and all State agencies such available information as relates to the work of the regional planning commission.

(9)

In the performance of its functions, enter upon land, with prior approval of the landowner, to make examinations and surveys.

(10)

Retain staff and consultant assistance in carrying out its duties and powers, and contract with one or more persons to provide administrative, clerical, information technology, human resources, or related functions.

(11)

Undertake comprehensive planning, including related preliminary planning, State capital investment plans, and engineering studies.

(12)

Carry out, with the cooperation of municipalities within the region, economic development programs for the appropriate development, improvement, protection, and preservation of the region’s physical and human resources.

(13)

Provide planning, training, and development services to local and regional communities and assist communities in evaluating economic conditions and prepare for economic growth and stability.

(14)

Gather economic and demographic information concerning the area served.

(15)

Assist existing business and industry, encourage the development and growth of small business, and to attract industry and commerce.

(16)

Include in its charter and bylaws adopted pursuant to section 4343 of this chapter the power to:

Acquire and dispose of a fee simple or lesser interest in real property through purchase, lease, grant, gift, bequest, or devise for the purpose of fulfilling its duties pursuant to this section and section 4345a of this title.

Borrow money and incur indebtedness for the purposes of purchasing or leasing property for office space, establish and administer a revolving loan fund, or establish a line of credit, if approved by a two-thirds vote of those representatives to the regional planning commission present and voting at a meeting to approve such action. Any obligation incurred under this subdivision (B):

shall not encumber the grand list or any property of a member municipality; and

in the case of a purchase, shall pledge the property to be purchased as collateral and shall not exceed the fair market value of such property.

At the request of one or more member municipalities, act as an escrow agent and hold funds related to a municipal capital project or a project subject to a municipal land use permit in an escrow account, including taxes to be paid by the project, fines, and developer fees. Funds so held shall be segregated in a special account for each project on the books of the regional planning commission and, within each project account, by municipality. However, this subdivision (C) shall not confer authority on a regional planning commission to hold tax increment revenues received from a tax increment financing district under chapter 53, subchapter 5 of this title.

Enter into contracts with public and private entities, including the State of Vermont and the federal government to provide regional planning services and fulfill its duties pursuant to this section and section 4345a of this title.

Invest funds held in reserve in any security or investment that is prudent under the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act. This subdivision (E) only shall apply to funds whose investment is not otherwise restricted by State or federal law; the terms of a grant, gift, or devise; or the terms of a contract or service agreement formed under this chapter.

(17)

Perform such other acts or functions as it may deem necessary or appropriate to fulfill the duties and obligations imposed by, and the intent and purposes of, this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 11, 1972;

1979, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1985, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. July 1, 1989;

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5;

2011, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. May 7, 2012;

2013, No. 36

, § 1;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2017, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 3, 2018.

§ 4345a.
Duties of regional planning commissions.

A regional planning commission created under this chapter shall:

Promote the mutual cooperation of its municipalities and assist and advise municipalities, compacts, and authorities within the region to facilitate economic development programs for the appropriate development, improvement, protection, and preservation of the region’s physical and human resources.

Advise municipal governing bodies with respect to public financing.

Provide technical and legal assistance to municipalities in the preparation and maintenance of plans, capacity studies, and bylaws and in related implementation activities.

Cooperate with the planning, legislative, or executive authorities of neighboring states, regions, counties, or municipalities to promote coordination of planning for, conservation, and development of the region and adjoining or neighboring territory.

Prepare a regional plan and amendments that are consistent with the goals established in section 4302 of this title, and compatible with approved municipal and adjoining regional plans. When preparing a regional plan, the regional planning commission shall:

develop and carry out a process that will encourage and enable widespread citizen involvement;

develop a regional data base that is compatible with, useful to, and shared with the geographic information system established under

3 V.S.A. § 20

;

conduct capacity studies;

identify areas of regional significance. Such areas may be, but are not limited to, historic sites, earth resources, rare and irreplaceable natural areas, recreation areas and scenic areas;

use a land evaluation and site assessment system, that shall at a minimum use the criteria established by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under

6 V.S.A. § 8

, to identify viable agricultural lands;

consider the probable social and economic benefits and consequences of the proposed plan; and

prepare a report explaining how the regional plan is consistent with the goals established in section 4302 of this title.

Prepare implementation guidelines that will assist municipalities and the regional commission in developing a planning process that will attain, within a reasonable time, consistency with the goals established in section 4302 of this title. Guidelines, which may be revised at any time, shall be prepared initially by July 1, 1989.

Prepare, in conjunction with the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development, guidelines for the provision of affordable housing in the region, share information developed with respect to affordable housing with the municipalities in the region and with the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development, and consult with the Commissioner when developing the housing element of the regional plan.

Confirm municipal planning efforts, where warranted, as required under section 4350 of this title, and provide town clerks of the region with notice of confirmation.

At least every eight years, review the compatibility of municipal plans, and if the regional planning commission finds that growth in a municipality without an approved plan is adversely affecting an adjoining municipality, it shall notify the legislative body of both municipalities of that fact and shall urge that the municipal planning be undertaken to mitigate those adverse effects. If, within six months of receipt of this notice, the municipality creating the adverse effects does not have an approved municipal plan, the regional commission shall adopt appropriate amendments to the regional plan as it may deem appropriate to mitigate those adverse effects.

Develop strategies specifically designed to assist municipalities in defining and managing growth and development that have cumulative impacts.

Review proposed State capital expenditures for compatibility with regional plans.

Assist municipalities to review proposed State capital expenditures for compatibility with municipal plans.

Appear before District Environmental Commissions to aid them in making a determination as to the conformance of developments and subdivisions with the criteria of

10 V.S.A. § 6086

.

With respect to proceedings under

30 V.S.A. § 248

:

have the right to appear and participate; and

appear before the Public Utility Commission to aid in making determinations under that statute when requested by the Commission.

Hold public hearings.

Before requesting the services of a mediator with respect to a conflict that has arisen between adopted or proposed plans of two or more regions or two or more municipalities located in different regions, appoint a joint interregional commission, in cooperation with other affected regional commissions, for the purpose of negotiating differences.

As part of its regional plan, define a substantial regional impact, as the term may be used with respect to its region. This definition shall be given due consideration, where relevant, in State regulatory proceedings.

If a municipality requests the assistance of the regional planning commission in coordinating the way that its plan addresses projects of substantial regional impact with the way those projects are addressed by its neighbors’ planning efforts, the regional planning commission shall convene an ad hoc working group to address the issue. The working group shall be composed of representatives of all municipalities likely to be affected by the plan in question, regardless of whether or not they belong to the same region. With the assistance of a facilitator provided by the regional planning commission, the ad hoc working group will attempt to develop a proposed consensus with respect to projects of substantial regional impact. If a proposed consensus is developed, the results of the consensus will be reported to the planning commissions and legislative bodies represented.

Undertake studies and make recommendations on the conservation of energy and the development of renewable energy resources.

If designated as a clean water service provider under

10 V.S.A. § 924

, provide for the identification, prioritization, development, construction, inspection, verification, operation, and maintenance of clean water projects in the basin assigned to the regional planning commission in accordance with the requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapter 37, subchapter 5.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. July 1, 1989; amended

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2019, No. 76

, § 5.

§ 4345b.
Intermunicipal service agreements.

Prior to exercising the authority granted under this section, a regional planning commission shall:
(a) (1) Prior to exercising the authority granted under this section, a regional planning commission shall:

draft bylaws specifying the process for entering into, method of withdrawal from, and method of terminating service agreements with municipalities; and

hold one or more public hearings within the region to hear from interested parties and citizens regarding the draft bylaws.

At least 30 days prior to any hearing required under this subsection, notice of the time and place and a copy of the draft bylaws, with a request for comments, shall be delivered to the chair of the legislative body of each municipality within the region, which may be done electronically, provided the sender has proof of receipt. The regional planning commission shall make copies available to any individual or organization requesting a copy.

The regional planning commission may make revisions to the draft bylaws at any time prior to adoption of the bylaws. If revisions are made to the draft bylaws, the regional planning commission shall hold a final hearing and shall deliver notice as required in subdivision (2) of this subsection.

The draft bylaws required under subsection (a) of this section shall be adopted by a vote of at least 67 percent of the commissioners of the regional planning commission in accordance with the voting procedures of the regional planning commission.
(b) (1) The draft bylaws required under subsection (a) of this section shall be adopted by a vote of at least 67 percent of the commissioners of the regional planning commission in accordance with the voting procedures of the regional planning commission.

The draft bylaws shall be considered duly adopted and shall take effect 35 days after a vote required under this subsection, unless, within 35 days of the date of adoption, the regional planning commission receives certification from the legislative bodies of a majority of the municipalities in the region vetoing the proposed bylaws. In such case, the bylaws shall be deemed repealed.

Upon adoption of the bylaws under subsection (b) of this section, a regional planning commission may:

promote cooperative arrangements and coordinate, implement, and administer service agreements among municipalities, including arrangements and action with respect to planning, community development, joint purchasing, intermunicipal services, infrastructure, and related activities; and

exercise any power, privilege, or authority, as defined within a service agreement under subsection (d) of this section, capable of exercise by a municipality as necessary or desirable for dealing with problems of local or regional concern.

In exercising the powers set forth in subsection (c) of this section, a regional planning commission shall enter into a service agreement with one or more municipalities.
(d) (1) In exercising the powers set forth in subsection (c) of this section, a regional planning commission shall enter into a service agreement with one or more municipalities.

Participation by a municipality shall be voluntary and only valid upon appropriate action by the legislative body of the municipality. To become effective, a service agreement shall be ratified by the regional planning commission and the legislative bodies of the municipalities who are a party to the service agreement.

A service agreement shall describe the services to be provided and the amount of funds payable by each municipality that is a party to the service agreement. Service of personnel, use of equipment and office space, and other necessary services may be accepted from municipalities as part of their financial support.

Any modification to a service agreement shall not become effective unless approved by the legislative body of the municipalities who are a party to the service agreement.

A regional planning commission shall not have the following powers under this section:

essential legislative functions;

taxing authority; or

eminent domain.

Funds provided for regional planning under section 4341a or 4346 of this chapter shall not be used to provide services under a service agreement without prior written authorization from the State agency or other entity providing the funds.
(f) (1) Funds provided for regional planning under section 4341a or 4346 of this chapter shall not be used to provide services under a service agreement without prior written authorization from the State agency or other entity providing the funds.

A commission shall not use municipal funds or grants provided for regional planning services under this chapter to cover the costs of providing services under any service agreement under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 4346.
Appropriations.

Regional planning commissions may apply for, receive, and expend monies from any source, public or private, including grants, loans, and funds made available by the participating municipalities, and by an agency or department of the State of Vermont, out of State funds appropriated to that agency or department for this purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any municipal charter, any municipality may appropriate and expend funds to and for regional planning commissions either by the authorization of its voters or by incorporating such amount as a line item in their administrative budget.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 11, 1972;

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010;

2013, No. 36

, § 2.

§ 4347.
Purposes of regional plan.

A regional plan shall be made with the general purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, efficient, and economic development of the region which will, in accordance with the present and future needs and resources, best promote the health, safety, order, convenience, prosperity, and welfare of the inhabitants as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development. This general purpose includes recommending a distribution of population and of the uses of the land for urbanization, trade, industry, habitation, recreation, agriculture, forestry, and other uses as will tend to:

create conditions favorable to transportation, health, safety, civic activities, and educational and cultural opportunities;

reduce the wastes of financial, energy, and human resources which result from either excessive congestion or excessive scattering of population;

promote an efficient and economic utilization of drainage, energy, sanitary, and other facilities and resources;

promote the conservation of the supply of food, water, energy, and minerals;

promote the production of food and fiber resources and the reasonable use of mineral, water, and renewable energy resources; and

promote the development of housing suitable to the needs of the region and its communities.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1979, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 22, 23, eff. July 1, 1989.

§ 4348.
Adoption and amendment of regional plan.

A regional planning commission shall adopt a regional plan. Any plan for a region, and any amendment thereof, shall be prepared by the regional planning commission. At the outset of the planning process and throughout the process, regional planning commissions shall solicit the participation of local citizens and organizations by holding informal working sessions that suit the needs of local people.

The regional planning commission shall hold two or more public hearings within the region after public notice on any proposed plan or amendment. The minimum number of required public hearings may be specified within the bylaws of the regional planning commission.

At least 30 days prior to the first hearing, a copy of the proposed plan or amendment, with a request for general comments and for specific comments with respect to the extent to which the plan or amendment is consistent with the goals established in section 4302 of this title, shall be delivered physically or electronically with proof of receipt or sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to each of the following:

the chair of the legislative body of each municipality within the region;

the executive director of each abutting regional planning commission;

the Department of Housing and Community Development within the Agency of Commerce and Community Development;

business, conservation, low-income advocacy, and other community or interest groups or organizations that have requested notice in writing prior to the date the hearing is warned; and

the Agency of Natural Resources and the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

Any of the foregoing bodies, or their representatives, may submit comments on the proposed regional plan or amendment to the regional planning commission, and may appear and be heard in any proceeding with respect to the adoption of the proposed plan or amendment.

The regional planning commission may make revisions to the proposed plan or amendment at any time not less than 30 days prior to the final public hearing held under this section. If the proposal is changed, a copy of the proposed change shall be delivered physically or electronically with proof of receipt or by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the chair of the legislative body of each municipality within the region, and to any individual or organization requesting a copy, at least 30 days prior to the final hearing.

A regional plan or amendment shall be adopted by not less than a 60 percent vote of the commissioners representing municipalities, in accordance with the bylaws of the regional planning commission, and immediately submitted to the legislative bodies of the municipalities that comprise the region. The plan or amendment shall be considered duly adopted and shall take effect 35 days after the date of adoption, unless, within 35 days of the date of adoption, the regional planning commission receives certification from the legislative bodies of a majority of the municipalities in the region vetoing the proposed plan or amendment. In case of such a veto, the plan or amendment shall be deemed rejected.

Regional plans may be reviewed from time to time and may be amended in the light of new developments and changed conditions affecting the region.

In proceedings under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151, 10 V.S.A. chapter 159, and

30 V.S.A. § 248

, in which the provisions of a regional plan or a municipal plan are relevant to the determination of any issue in those proceedings:

the provisions of the regional plan shall be given effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with the provisions of a duly adopted municipal plan;

to the extent that such a conflict exists, the regional plan shall be given effect if it is demonstrated that the project under consideration in the proceedings would have a substantial regional impact.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 11, 1972;

1979, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. July 1, 1989;

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a;

1989, No. 286

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 22, 1990;

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010;

2015, No. 64

, § 28;

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 4348a.
Elements of a regional plan.

A regional plan shall be consistent with the goals established in section 4302 of this title and shall include the following:

A statement of basic policies of the region to guide the future growth and development of land and of public services and facilities, and to protect the environment.

A land use element, which shall consist of a map and statement of present and prospective land uses, that:

Indicates those areas proposed for forests, recreation, agriculture (using the agricultural lands identification process established in

6 V.S.A. § 8

), residence, commerce, industry, public, and semi-public uses, open spaces, areas reserved for flood plain, and areas identified by the State, regional planning commissions, or municipalities that require special consideration for aquifer protection; for wetland protection; for the maintenance of forest blocks, wildlife habitat, and habitat connectors; or for other conservation purposes.

Indicates those areas within the region that are likely candidates for designation under sections 2793 (downtown development districts), 2793a (village centers), 2793b (new town centers), and 2793c (growth centers) of this title.

Indicates locations proposed for developments with a potential for regional impact, as determined by the regional planning commission, including flood control projects, surface water supply projects, industrial parks, office parks, shopping centers and shopping malls, airports, tourist attractions, recreational facilities, private schools, public or private colleges, and residential developments or subdivisions.

Sets forth the present and prospective location, amount, intensity, and character of such land uses and the appropriate timing or sequence of land development activities in relation to the provision of necessary community facilities and services.

Indicates those areas that have the potential to sustain agriculture and recommendations for maintaining them which may include transfer of development rights, acquisition of development rights, or farmer assistance programs.

Indicates those areas that are important as forest blocks and habitat connectors and plans for land development in those areas to minimize forest fragmentation and promote the health, viability, and ecological function of forests. A plan may include specific policies to encourage the active management of those areas for wildlife habitat, water quality, timber production, recreation, or other values or functions identified by the regional planning commission.

An energy element, which may include an analysis of resources, needs, scarcities, costs, and problems within the region across all energy sectors, including electric, thermal, and transportation; a statement of policy on the conservation and efficient use of energy and the development and siting of renewable energy resources; a statement of policy on patterns and densities of land use likely to result in conservation of energy; and an identification of potential areas for the development and siting of renewable energy resources and areas that are unsuitable for siting those resources or particular categories or sizes of those resources.

A transportation element, which may consist of a statement of present and prospective transportation and circulation facilities, and a map showing existing and proposed highways, including limited access highways, and streets by type and character of improvement, and where pertinent, anticipated points of congestion, parking facilities, transit routes, terminals, bicycle paths and trails, scenic roads, airports, railroads and port facilities, and other similar facilities or uses, and recommendations to meet future needs for such facilities, with indications of priorities of need, costs, and method of financing.

A utility and facility element, consisting of a map and statement of present and prospective local and regional community facilities and public utilities, whether publicly or privately owned, showing existing and proposed educational, recreational and other public sites, buildings and facilities, including public schools, State office buildings, hospitals, libraries, power generating plants and transmission lines, wireless telecommunications facilities and ancillary improvements, water supply, sewage disposal, refuse disposal, storm drainage, and other similar facilities and activities, and recommendations to meet future needs for those facilities, with indications of priority of need.

A statement of policies on the:

preservation of rare and irreplaceable natural areas, scenic and historic features and resources; and

protection and improvement of the quality of waters of the State to be used in the development and furtherance of the applicable basin plans established by the Secretary of Natural Resources under

10 V.S.A. § 1253

.

A program for the implementation of the regional plan’s objectives, including a recommended investment strategy for regional facilities and services based on a capacity study of the elements in this section.

A statement indicating how the regional plan relates to development trends, needs, and plans and regional plans for adjacent municipalities and regions.

A housing element that identifies the need for housing for all economic groups in the region and communities. In establishing the identified need, due consideration shall be given to data gathered pursuant to subsection 4382(c) of this title. If no such data has been gathered, the regional planning commission shall gather it.

An economic development element that describes present economic conditions and the location, type, and scale of desired economic development, and identifies policies, projects, and programs necessary to foster economic growth.

A flood resilience element that:
(11) (A) A flood resilience element that:

identifies flood hazard and fluvial erosion hazard areas, based on river corridor maps provided by the Secretary of Natural Resources pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 1428(a)

or maps recommended by the Secretary, and designates those areas to be protected, including floodplains, river corridors, land adjacent to streams, wetlands, and upland forests, to reduce the risk of flood damage to infrastructure and improved property; and

recommends policies and strategies to protect the areas identified and designated under this subdivision (A) and to mitigate risks to public safety, critical infrastructure, historic structures, and public investments.

A flood resilience element may reference an existing regional hazard mitigation plan approved under 44 C.F.R. § 201.6.

The various elements and statements shall be correlated with the land use element and with each other. The maps called for by this section may be incorporated on one or more maps, and may be referred to in each separate statement called for by this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1985, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 26, 27, eff. July 1, 1989;

1997, No. 94

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 15, 1998;

2011, No. 52

, § 32, eff. July 1, 2012;

2013, No. 16

, § 3, eff. July 1, 2014;

2013, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 27, 2014;

2015, No. 64

, § 29;

2015, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. Jan. 1, 2018;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 4348b.
Readoption of regional plans.

Unless they are readopted, all regional plans, including all prior amendments, shall expire every eight years.

A regional plan that has expired or is about to expire may be readopted as provided under section 4348 of this title for the adoption of a regional plan or amendment. Prior to any readoption, the regional planning commission shall prepare an assessment report which shall be submitted to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development and the municipalities within the region. The assessment report may include:
(b) (1) A regional plan that has expired or is about to expire may be readopted as provided under section 4348 of this title for the adoption of a regional plan or amendment. Prior to any readoption, the regional planning commission shall prepare an assessment report which shall be submitted to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development and the municipalities within the region. The assessment report may include:

the extent to which the plan has been implemented since adoption or readoption;

an evaluation of the goals and policies and any amendments necessary due to changing conditions of the region;

an evaluation of the land use element and any amendments necessary to reflect changes in land use within the region or changes to regional goals and policies;

priorities for implementation in the next five years; and

updates to information and data necessary to support goals and policies.

The readopted plan shall remain in effect for the ensuing eight years unless earlier readopted.

Upon the expiration of a regional plan under this section, the regional plan shall be of no further effect in any other proceeding.

All regional plans that expire after July 1, 1991 shall be readopted to be consistent with planning goals and shall follow the review process referred to in 1988 Acts and Resolves No. 200.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. July 1, 1989;

1989, No. 101

, §§ 2, 3;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010;

2011, No. 52

, § 30, eff. July 1, 2012.

§ 4349.
Regional plan; adoption by municipality.

If a regional planning commission prepares and adopts a regional plan, the regional plan or a portion thereof may then be adopted by the legislative body of any member municipality as its plan in accordance with subchapter 5 of this chapter.

The legislative body of any municipality may designate the regional planning commission of a region of which such municipality is a member as the planning commission of such municipality, and, if so designated, the regional planning commission shall thereafter act as the planning commission of such municipality until a planning commission is created under section 4321 of this title or until such regional planning commission notifies such legislative body, in writing, that it no longer will so act.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968.